Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-32,100
District; recreation area; regulate vehicle traffic; violation; penalty.

A district may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing vehicle traffic in a recreation area as provided in the Nebraska Rules of the Road. Any person who violates any such rule or regulation shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1984, LB 861, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 1.

Nebraska Rules of the Road, see section 60-601.